District of Columbia statutes.
5-1103

Definitions.

For purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Board” means the Police Complaints Board.

(2)

“Complaint examiner” means the person designated by the Executive Director to determine the merits of a complaint.

(3)

“Executive Director” means the head of the Office of Police Complaints.

(3A)

“Gender identity or expression” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 2-1401.02(12A).

(4)

“Office” means the Office of Police Complaints.

Mar 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-208, § 4, 45 DCR 8107
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 902(a), 51 DCR 9406
June 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-177, § 8(a), 55 DCR 3696

History

1981 Ed., § 4-913.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 15-194, in pars. (1), (3), and (4), substituted “Police Complaints” for “Citizen Complaint Review”.
D.C. Law 17-177 added par. (3A).

Effect of Amendments